Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 1. Primary Elections.

Sec. 15.25.010.
Provision for primary election.

Candidates for the elective state executive and state and national legislative offices shall be nominated in a primary election by direct vote of the people in the manner prescribed by this chapter. The primary election does not serve to determine the nominee of a political party or political group but serves only to narrow the number of candidates whose names will appear on the ballot at the general election. Except as provided in AS

15.25.100(d)

, only the four candidates who receive the greatest number of votes for any office shall advance to the general election.

History.

(§ 5.01 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 1 SLA 1967; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 103 SLA 2001; § 37, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, rewrote the second and third sentences, which read, “the director shall prepare and provide a primary election ballot for each political party. A voter registered as affiliated with a political party may vote that party’s ballot.”, deleted the fourth and fifth sentences, which read, “A voter registered as nonpartisan or undeclared rather than as affiliated with a particular political party may vote the political party ballot of the voter’s choice unless prohibited from doing so under AS

15.25.014

. A voter registered as affiliated with a political party may not vote the ballot of a different political party unless permitted to do so under AS

15.25.014

.”

Sec. 15.25.014.
Participation in primary election selection of a political party’s candidates.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.25.020.
Date of primary.

The primary election is held on the third Tuesday in August of every even-numbered year.

History.

(§ 5.02 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 1 SLA 1967; am § 22 ch 73 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, substituted “third Tuesday” for “fourth Tuesday”.

Sec. 15.25.030.
Declaration of candidacy.

A person who seeks to become a candidate in the primary election or a special primary election shall execute and file a declaration of candidacy. The declaration shall be executed under oath before an officer authorized to take acknowledgments and must state in substance

the full name of the candidate;

the full mailing address of the candidate;

if the candidacy is for the office of state senator or state representative, the house or senate district of which the candidate is a resident;

the office for which the candidate seeks nomination;

the political party or political group with which the candidate is registered as affiliated, or whether the candidate would prefer a nonpartisan or undeclared designation placed after the candidate's name on the ballot;

the full residence address of the candidate, and the date on which residency at that address began;

the date of the primary election or special primary election at which the candidate seeks nomination;

the length of residency in the state and in the district of the candidate;

that the candidate will meet the specific citizenship requirements of the office for which the person is a candidate;

that the candidate is a qualified voter as required by law;

that the candidate will meet the specific age requirements of the office for which the person is a candidate; if the candidacy is for the office of state representative, that the candidate will be at least 21 years of age on the first scheduled day of the first regular session of the legislature convened after the election; if the candidacy is for the office of state senator, that the candidate will be at least 25 years of age on the first scheduled day of the first regular session of the legislature convened after the election; if the candidacy is for the office of governor or lieutenant governor, that the candidate will be at least 30 years of age on the first Monday in December following election or, if the office is to be filled by special election under AS

15.40.230

—

15.40.310

, that the candidate will be at least 30 years of age on the date of certification of the results of the special election; or, for any other office, by the time that the candidate, if elected, is sworn into office;

that the candidate requests that the candidate’s name be placed on the primary election or special primary election ballot;

that the required fee accompanies the declaration;

that the person is not a candidate for any other office to be voted on at the primary or general election and that the person is not a candidate for this office under any other declaration of candidacy or nominating petition;

the manner in which the candidate wishes the candidate’s name to appear on the ballot;

if the candidacy is for the office of the governor, the name of the candidate for lieutenant governor running jointly with the candidate for governor; and

if the candidacy is for the office of lieutenant governor, the name of the candidate for governor running jointly with the candidate for lieutenant governor.

A person filing a declaration of candidacy under this section, other than a person subject to AS 24.60 who is filing a declaration for a state legislative office, shall simultaneously file with the director a statement of income sources and business interests that complies with the requirements of AS 39.50. A person who is subject to AS 24.60 and is filing a declaration of candidacy for state legislative office shall simultaneously file with the director a disclosure statement that complies with the requirements of AS

24.60.200

.

An incumbent public official, other than a legislator, who has a current statement of income sources and business interests under AS 39.50 on file with the Alaska Public Offices Commission, or an incumbent legislator who has a current disclosure statement under AS

24.60.200

on file with the Alaska Public Offices Commission, is not required to file a statement of income sources and business interests or a disclosure statement with the declaration of candidacy under (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 5.03 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 16 ch 125 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 53 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 1 SLA 1967; am § 35 ch 116 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 133 SLA 1977; am § 126 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 34 ch 50 SLA 1989; am §§ 15, 16 ch 67 SLA 1989; am §§ 32, 33 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 51 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 24 ch 2 FSSLA 2005; § 38, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2020, in paragraph (a)(5) of this section, the word "which" was substituted for "whom" to correct a manifest error in the 2020 initiative that amended subsection (a) of this section.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, in (a), in the introductory language, substituted “A person who seeks to become a candidate in the primary election or a special primary election” for “A member of a political party who seeks to become a candidate of the party in the primary election”, rewrote (a)(5), which read, “the name of the political party of which the person is a candidate for nomination”, in (a)(7), inserted “or special primary election” following “primary election”, in (a)(12), inserted “or special primary” following “the primary”, rewrote (a)(16), which read, “that the candidate is registered to vote as a member of the political party whose nomination is being sought”, added (a)(17), and made a related change.

Administrative Code. —

For administration of local and regional elections, see 6 AAC 27.

Sec. 15.25.040.
Manner and date of filing declaration.

The declaration is filed by either

the actual physical delivery of the declaration in person or by mail at or before 5:00 p.m., prevailing time, June 1 of the year in which a general election is held for the office; or

reliable electronic transmission of a copy in substance of the statements made in paragraphs (1) — (5) of the declaration as required by AS

15.25.030(a)

at or before 5:00 p.m., prevailing time, June 1 of the year in which a general election is held for the office and also the actual physical delivery of the declaration containing paragraphs (1) — (16) as required by AS

15.25.030(a)

by mail that is received not more than 15 days after that time.

If the postmark is illegible, a dated receipt from the post office where dispatched shall be acceptable as evidence of mailing. If June 1 is a Sunday or holiday, the deadlines for postmarking and receipt of the declaration shall be extended 24 hours in each instance.

A candidate for a statewide office or a candidate for a district-wide office shall file either with the director or an election supervisor. If the candidate files the declaration with an election supervisor, the election supervisor shall immediately forward the declaration to the director.

If the declaration filed under (a) of this section is not received within seven calendar days, the candidate shall be notified of nonreceipt. The candidate shall have the opportunity to refile the declaration with proof that a previous declaration has been filed in a timely manner and in accordance with law.

History.

(§ 5.04 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 17 ch 125 SLA 1962; am § 20 ch 80 SLA 1963; am §§ 3, 4 ch 26 SLA 1966; am § 22 ch 136 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 1972; am §§ 11, 12 ch 38 SLA 1974; am § 25 ch 197 SLA 1975; am § 4 ch 133 SLA 1977; am § 127 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 25 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 57 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For date of filing petition, see AS

15.25.150

.

Sec. 15.25.042.
Eligibility of a candidate.

If the director receives a complaint regarding the eligibility of a candidate for a particular office, the director shall determine eligibility under regulations adopted by the director. The director shall determine the eligibility of the candidate within 30 days of the receipt of the complaint.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, the director shall determine the eligibility of the candidate by a preponderance of the evidence.

If a candidate for the legislature has been registered to vote at any time during the 12 months preceding the filing of the declaration of candidacy in a district other than the district in which the declaration of candidacy has been filed, the director may not determine that a candidate is eligible except under a standard of clear and convincing evidence.

A person may not be a resident of two districts at the same time.

History.

(§ 24 ch 85 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For administration of local and regional elections, see 6 AAC 27.

Collateral references. —

Constitutionality of candidate participation provisions for primary elections. 121 ALR5th 1.

Sec. 15.25.043.
Determination of residency of a candidate.

In determining the residence within a house district of a qualified voter for the purposes of compliance with art. II, sec. 2, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the director shall apply the rules established in AS

15.05.020

together with the following rules:

a person establishes residence within a house district

by actual physical presence at a specific location within the district; and

by maintaining a habitation at the specific location;

a person may maintain a place of residence at a specific location within a district while away from the location for purposes of employment, education, military service, or vacation if the person does not establish residency at another location; and

a qualified voter loses residence by voting in another house district or in another state’s elections.

History.

(§ 24 ch 85 SLA 1986; am § 52 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For administration of local and regional elections, see 6 AAC 27.

Collateral references. —

Construction and application of statutes and ordinances concerning establishment of residency, 74 ALR6th 209.

Sec. 15.25.045.
Withdrawal of candidacy.

Notice of withdrawal of candidacy must be in writing over the signature of the candidate.

History.

(§ 23 ch 136 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For administration of local and regional elections, see 6 AAC 27.

Sec. 15.25.050.
Requirement of filing fee.

At the time the declaration is filed, each candidate shall pay a nonrefundable filing fee to the director. The filing fee for candidates for office of governor, lieutenant governor, United States senator, and United States representative is $100. The filing fee for candidates for office of state senator and state representative is $30.

An indigent person as defined by regulations adopted under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) may file a statement of indigency in the form prescribed by regulation in place of the filing fee required by this section.

History.

(§ 5.05 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 128 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 25 ch 85 SLA 1986)

Sec. 15.25.055.
Removal of name from primary ballot.

A candidate’s name must appear on the primary election ballot unless notice of the withdrawal from the primary is received by the director at least 52 days before the date of the primary election.

History.

(§ 24 ch 136 SLA 1966; am § 25 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 129 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 17 ch 67 SLA 1989; am § 23 ch 73 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, substituted “52 days” for “48 days”.

Sec. 15.25.056.
Nomination by party petition where incumbent dies or is disqualified or incapacitated.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.25.060.
Preparation and distribution of ballots.

The primary election ballots shall be prepared and distributed by the director in the manner prescribed for general election ballots except as specifically provided otherwise for the primary election. The director shall prepare and provide a primary election ballot that contains all of the candidates for elective state executive and state and national legislative offices and all of the ballot titles and propositions required to appear on the ballot at the primary election. The director shall print the ballots on white paper and place the names of all candidates who have properly filed in groups according to offices. The order of the placement of the names for each office shall be as provided for the general election ballot. Blank spaces may not be provided on the ballot for the writing or pasting in of names.

History.

(§ 5.06 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 1 SLA 1967; am § 132 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 8 ch 58 SLA 1995; am § 5 ch 103 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 96 SLA 2003; am § 25 ch 2 FSSLA 2005; § 39, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, rewrote the section.

Sec. 15.25.070.
No write-in vote on primary ballot.

A voter may not vote for a person whose name is not on the ballot. Votes cast for a person whose name is not on the ballot may not be counted, but writing in a candidate’s name does not invalidate the entire ballot.

History.

(§ 5.07 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 5 ch 1 SLA 1967)

Sec. 15.25.080.
Declaration of party preference. [Repealed, § 231 ch 100 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 15.25.090.
General procedure for conduct of primary election.

Unless specifically provided otherwise, all provisions regarding the conduct of a general election shall govern the conduct of a primary election, including provisions concerning voter qualification; provisions regarding the duties, powers, rights, and obligations of the director, of other election officials, and of cities and organized boroughs; provision for notification of the election; provisions regarding payment of election expenses; provisions regarding employees being allowed time from work to vote; provisions for the counting, review, and certification of returns; provisions for the determination of tie votes and of recount, contests, and appeal; and provisions for absentee voting.

History.

(§ 5.09 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 7 ch 1 SLA 1967; am § 133 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 48 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, deleted “but not limited to,” following “including”, and made stylistic changes.

Sec. 15.25.100.
Placement of candidates on general election ballot.

Except as provided in (b) – (g) of this section, of the names of candidates that appear on the primary election ballot under AS

15.25.010

, the director shall place on the general election ballot only the names of the four candidates receiving the greatest number of votes for an office. For purposes of this subsection and (b) of this section, candidates for lieutenant governor and governor are treated as a single paired unit.

If two candidates tie in having the fourth greatest number of votes for an office in the primary election, the director shall determine under (g) of this section which candidate's name shall appear on the general election ballot.

Except as otherwise provided in (d) of this section, if a candidate nominated at the primary election dies, withdraws, resigns, becomes disqualified from holding office for which the candidate is nominated, or is certified as being incapacitated in the manner prescribed by this section after the primary election and 64 or more days before the general election, the vacancy shall be filled by the director by replacing the withdrawn candidate with the candidate who received the fifth most votes in the primary election.

If the withdrawn, resigned, deceased, disqualified, or incapacitated candidate was a candidate for governor or lieutenant governor, the replacement candidate is selected by the following process:

if the withdrawn, resigned, deceased, disqualified, or incapacitated candidate was the candidate for governor, that candidate's lieutenant governor running mate becomes the candidate for governor, thereby creating a vacancy for the lieutenant governor candidate;

when any vacancy for the lieutenant governor candidate occurs, the candidate for governor shall select a qualified running mate to be the lieutenant governor candidate and notify the director of that decision.

The director shall place the name of the persons selected through this process as candidates for governor and lieutenant governor on the general election ballot.

For a candidate to be certified as incapacitated under (c) of this section, a panel of three licensed physicians, not more than two of whom may be of the same party, shall provide the director with a sworn statement that the candidate is physically or mentally incapacitated to an extent that would, in the panel's judgment, prevent the candidate from active service during the term of office if elected.

If the director is unable to make a determination under this section because the candidates received an equal number of votes, the determination may be made by lot under AS

15.20.530

.

History.

(§ 5.10 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 134 ch 100 SLA 1980; § 40, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, rewrote the section.

Sec. 15.25.105.
Write-in candidates in the general election.

If a candidate does not appear on the primary election ballot or is not successful in advancing to the general election and wishes to be a candidate in the general election, the candidate may file as a write-in candidate. Votes for a write-in candidate may not be counted unless that candidate has filed a letter of intent with the director stating

the full name of the candidate;

the full residence address of the candidate and the date on which residency at that address began;

the full mailing address of the candidate;

the political party or political group with which the candidate is registered as affiliated, or whether the candidate would prefer a nonpartisan or undeclared designation;

if the candidate is for the office of state senator or state representative, the house or senate district of which the candidate is a resident;

the office that the candidate seeks;

the date of the election at which the candidate seeks election;

the length of residency in the state and in the house district of the candidate;

the name of the candidate as the candidate wishes it to be written on the ballot by the voter;

that the candidate meets the specific citizenship requirements of the office for which the person is a candidate;

that the candidate will meet the specific age requirements of the office for which the person is a candidate; if the candidacy is for the office of state representative, that the candidate will be at least 21 years of age on the first scheduled day of the first regular session of the legislature convened after the election; if the candidacy is for the office of state senator, that the candidate will be at least 25 years of age on the first scheduled day of the first regular session of the legislature convened after the election; if the candidacy is for the office of governor or lieutenant governor, that the candidate will be at least 30 years of age on the first Monday in December following election or, if the office is to be filled by special election under AS

15.40.230

—

15.40.310

, that the candidate will be at least 30 years of age on the date of certification of the results of the special election; or, for any other office, by the time that the candidate, if elected, is sworn into office;

that the candidate is a qualified voter as required by law; and

that the candidate is not a candidate for any other office to be voted on at the general election and that the candidate is not a candidate for this office under any other nominating petition or declaration of candidacy.

If a write-in candidate is running for the office of governor, the candidate must file a joint letter of intent together with a candidate for lieutenant governor.

A letter of intent under (a) of this section must be filed not later than five days before the general election.

History.

(§ 58 ch 82 SLA 2000; am § 26 ch 2 FSSLA 2005; §§ 41 and 42, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2020, in paragraph (a)(4) of this section, the word “which” was substituted for “whom” to correct a manifest error in the 2020 initiative that amended this section.

Administrative Code. —

For administration of local and regional elections, see 6 AAC 27.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, rewrote (a)(4), which read, “the name of the political party or political group of which the candidate is a member, if any”; in (b), deleted the last sentence, which read, “Both candidates must be of the same political party or group.”

Sec. 15.25.110.
Filling vacancies by party petition.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.25.120.
Requirements for party petition.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.25.135.
Election of party committeemen and committeewomen. [Repealed, § 21 ch 80 SLA 1963.]